test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kolgooh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - kolgooh: # 1B
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Nom: kolgooh
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Gen: kolgooh
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Acc: kolgooh
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Ill: kolgohân
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Loc: kolgohist
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Com: kolgoháin
    kolgooh+N+Sg+Abe: kolgoohttáá
    kolgooh+N+Ess:    kolgohin
    kolgooh+N+Par:    kolgohid
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Nom: kolgoheh
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Gen: kolgohij
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Acc: kolgohijd
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Ill: kolgoháid
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Loc: kolgohijn
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Com: kolgohijguin
    kolgooh+N+Pl+Abe: kolgohijttáá
   
